California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(h) A contract, lease, license, or any other agreement to which the Bureau of Cannabis Control, the Department of Consumer Affairs, the State Department of Public Health, or the Department of Food and Agriculture is a party shall not be void or voidable by reason of this section, and shall continue in full force and effect, with the Department of Cannabis Control assuming all of the rights, obligations, liabilities, and duties of the Bureau of Cannabis Control, the State Department of Public Health, and the Department of Food and Agriculture relating to the transfer of duties, powers, purposes, functions,
 responsibilities, and jurisdiction made pursuant to this section. The assumption by the Department of Cannabis Control shall not in any way affect the rights of the parties to any contract, lease, license, or agreement.

(i) This section shall become operative on and after July 1, 2021, or the operative date of the act adding this section, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 8.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26011.

Neither the director nor any member of the Cannabis Control Appeals Panel established under Section 26040 shall do any of the following:

(a) Receive any commission or profit whatsoever, directly or indirectly, from any person applying for or receiving any license or permit under this division.

(b) Engage or have any interest in the sale or any insurance covering a licensee’s business or premises.

(c) Engage or have any interest in the sale of equipment for use upon the premises of a licensee engaged in commercial cannabis activity.

(d) Knowingly solicit any licensee for the purchase of
 tickets for benefits or contributions for benefits.

(e) Knowingly request any licensee to donate or receive money, or any other thing of value, for the benefit of any person whatsoever.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 9.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26011.5.

The protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the department in exercising licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions under this division. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 10.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26012.

(a) It being a matter of statewide concern, except as otherwise authorized in this division, the department shall have the sole authority to create, issue, deny, renew, discipline, condition, suspend, or revoke licenses for commercial cannabis activity.

(b) The department shall have the authority to collect fees in connection with activities it regulates concerning cannabis. The department may create licenses in addition to those identified in this division that the department deems necessary to effectuate its duties under this division.

(c) For the performance of its duties, the department has the power conferred by Sections 11180 to 11191, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 87, Sec. 2.   (SB 160)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26012.5.

(a) The department shall provide on its internet website information regarding the status of every license issued by the department in accordance with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(b) Beginning January 1, 2022, the information provided on the department’s internet website pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include information on suspensions and revocations of licenses and final decisions adopted by the department pursuant to the Administrative Procedure
 Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) relating to persons or businesses licensed or regulated by the department.

(c) The information provided shall not include personal information, including home addresses, home telephone numbers, dates of birth, or social security numbers. The department shall disclose the county of a licensee’s address of record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 17.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26012.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, “demographic data” includes, but is not limited to, race, ethnicity, gender, sexual orientation, income level, education level, prior convictions, and veteran status.

(b) (1) The department shall collect demographic data about every person applying for a license.

(2) The demographic data may be requested when an initial license is issued or at the time of license renewal.

(c) The department shall consolidate the demographic data received as described in subdivision (b) and shall publish the aggregate demographic data that it collects on its internet website.

(d) The department shall maintain the confidentiality of the information it receives from an applicant or licensee under this section and shall only release the information in an aggregate form that cannot be used to identify an individual.

(e) A licensee or applicant shall not be required to provide the information specified in subdivision (b) as a condition of licensure or
 license renewal, and a licensee shall not be subject to discipline for not providing the information specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   (SB 1109)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Sec. 2 of Ch. 878 of Stats. 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

26013.

(a) The department shall make and prescribe reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement, administer, and enforce its duties under this division in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Those rules and regulations shall be consistent with the purposes and intent of the Control, Regulate and Tax Adult Use of Marijuana Act.

(b) (1) The department may adopt emergency regulations to consolidate, clarify, or make consistent regulations, including emergency regulations adopted before or in
 place as of July 1, 2021, or to implement Section 26010.7.

(2) The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as, or substantially equivalent to, an emergency regulation previously adopted as authorized by this section. Any such readoption shall be limited to one time for each regulation.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, the adoption of emergency regulations and the readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The emergency regulations and the readopted emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be each submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations may be adopted.

(c) Regulations issued under this division shall be necessary to achieve the purposes of this division, based on best available evidence, and shall mandate only commercially feasible procedures, technology, or other requirements, and shall not unreasonably restrain or inhibit the development of alternative procedures or technology to achieve the same substantive requirements, nor shall the regulations make compliance so onerous that the operation under a cannabis license is not worthy of being carried out in practice by a reasonably prudent businessperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 13.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26013.5.

(a) Notice of any action of the department required by this division to be given may be signed and given by the director or an authorized employee of the department and may be made personally or in the manner prescribed by Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or in the manner prescribed by Section 124 of this code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 11505 of the Government Code, whenever written notice, including a notice, order, or document served pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, is required to be given by the department, the notice may be given by regular mail addressed to the last known address of the licensee or by personal service, at the
 option of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 14.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26014.

(a) The department shall convene an advisory committee to advise the department on the development of standards and regulations pursuant to this division, including best practices and guidelines that protect public health and safety while ensuring a regulated environment for commercial cannabis activity that does not impose such barriers so as to perpetuate, rather than reduce and eliminate, the illicit market for cannabis.

(b) The advisory committee members shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of the cannabis industry, including medicinal cannabis, representatives of labor organizations, appropriate state and local agencies, persons who work directly with racially, ethnically, and economically diverse populations, public health experts, and other subject matter experts, including representatives from the
 Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, with expertise in regulating commercial activity for adult-use intoxicating substances. The advisory committee members shall be determined by the director.

(c) Commencing on January 1, 2019, the advisory committee shall publish an annual public report describing its activities including, but not limited to, the recommendations the advisory committee made to the department during the immediately preceding calendar year and whether those recommendations were implemented by the department.

(d) Each member of the advisory committee shall be reimbursed for traveling and other expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties. The payments in each instance shall be made only from the fund and shall be subject to the availability of money.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 15.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26015.

(a) The department may make or cause to be made such investigation as it deems necessary to carry out its duties under this division.

(b) The chief of enforcement and all investigators, inspectors, and deputies of the department identified by the director have the authority of peace officers while engaged in exercising the powers granted or performing the duties imposed upon them in enforcing the laws of the state or commencing directly or indirectly any criminal prosecution arising from any investigation conducted under these laws. All persons herein referred to shall be deemed to be acting within the scope of employment with respect to all acts and matters set forth in this
 section.

(c) The department may employ individuals, who are not peace officers, to provide investigative services.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the department may employ peace officers and shall be exempt from the requirements of Section 13540 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 5.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26016.

For any hearing held pursuant to this division, except a hearing held under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26040), the department may delegate the power to hear and decide to an administrative law judge. Any hearing before an administrative law judge shall be pursuant to the procedures, rules, and limitations prescribed in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 17.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26017.

In any hearing before the department pursuant to this division, the department may pay any person appearing as a witness at the hearing at the request of the department pursuant to a subpoena, the person’s actual, necessary, and reasonable travel, food, and lodging expenses, not to exceed the amount authorized for state employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 18.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26018.

The department may on its own motion at any time before a penalty assessment is placed into effect, and without any further proceedings, review the penalty, but such review shall be limited to its reduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 19.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Enforcement [26030. - 26039.6.]

26030.

Grounds for disciplinary action include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Failure to comply with the provisions of this division or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this division.

(b) Conduct that constitutes grounds for denial of licensure pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 480) of Division 1.5 or discipline of a license pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 490) of Division 1.5.

(c) Any other grounds contained in regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this division.

(d) Failure to comply with any state law including, but not limited to, the payment of taxes as required under the Revenue and Taxation Code, except as provided for in this division or other California law.

(e) Knowing violations of any state or local law, ordinance, or regulation conferring worker protections or legal rights on the employees of a licensee.

(f) Failure to comply with the requirement of a local ordinance regulating commercial cannabis activity.

(g) The intentional and knowing sale of cannabis or cannabis products
 by an A-licensee to a person under 21 years of age.

(h) The intentional and knowing sale of medicinal cannabis or medicinal cannabis products by an M-licensee to a person without a physician’s recommendation.

(i) Failure to maintain safe conditions for inspection by the department.

(j) Failure to comply with any operating procedure submitted to the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 26051.5.

(k) Failure to comply with license conditions established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 26060.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 20.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26031.

(a) The department may suspend, revoke, place on probation with terms and conditions, or otherwise discipline licenses issued by the department and fine a licensee, after proper notice and hearing to the licensee, except as provided in Section 26031.01, if the licensee is found to have committed any of the acts or omissions constituting grounds for disciplinary action. The disciplinary proceedings under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers granted therein.

(b) The department may suspend or revoke a license when a local agency has notified the department that a licensee within its jurisdiction is in violation of state rules and regulations relating to commercial cannabis activities, and the department, through an investigation, has determined that the violation is grounds for suspension or revocation of the license.

(c) The department may take disciplinary action against a licensee for any violation of this division when the violation was committed by the licensee’s officers, directors, owners, agents, or employees while acting on behalf of the licensee or engaged in commercial cannabis activity.

(d) The
 suspension or expiration of a license issued by the department, or its suspension, forfeiture, or cancellation by order of the department or by order of a court of law, or its surrender without the written consent of the department, shall not, during any period in which it may be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated, deprive the department of its authority to institute or continue a disciplinary proceeding against the licensee upon any ground provided by law or to enter an order suspending or revoking the license or otherwise taking disciplinary action against the licensee on any such ground.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 21.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

26031.01.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 26031, the department may, before a hearing, suspend the license of a person who procured the issuance of the license by fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or by the making of any material misstatement of fact in the application for such license.

(b) The department shall not order the suspension of a license pursuant to subdivision (a) 90 days after the date of issuance of the license.

(c) An order of suspension pursuant to subdivision (a) shall expire on the effective date of a decision of the department after a hearing conducted pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) The department shall file and serve a person whose license is suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) the order of suspension and a statement of issues as defined in Section 11504 of the Government Code. The department may serve the person by regular mail addressed to the last known address of the person or by personal service.

(2) A person whose license is suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) shall have 30 days after service of the order of suspension and statement of issues in which to file with the department a written request for a hearing on the statement of issues filed against them.

(3) (A) The department shall hold a hearing within 30 days after receipt of a request pursuant to paragraph (2) unless the person requests or agrees to a continuance. If the person does not request or agree to a continuance and a hearing is not commenced
 within 30 days after receipt of the request for a hearing, the order of suspension shall be vacated and set aside unless the person requests or agrees to a continuance.

(B) If the person requests or agrees to a continuance, the department shall hold a hearing on the date to which the department and the person agreed. If a hearing is not commenced on that date, the order of suspension shall be vacated and set aside.

(4) If the department does not render a decision within 30 days after completion of the hearing, the order of suspension shall be vacated and set aside. 

(e) A hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall in all respects, except as otherwise expressly provided herein, conform to the substantive and procedural provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of
 the Government Code applicable to a hearing on a statement of issues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 22.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26031.1.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, in an order issued in resolution of a disciplinary proceeding before the department, the administrative law judge, upon request, may direct a licensee found to have committed a violation to pay a sum not to exceed the reasonable costs of the investigation and enforcement of the case.

(b) A certified copy of the actual costs, or a good faith estimate of costs where actual costs are not available, signed by the department or its designated representative shall be prima facie evidence of reasonable costs of investigation and prosecution of the case. The costs shall include the amount of investigative and enforcement costs up to the date of the hearing, including, but not limited to, charges imposed by
 the Attorney General.

(c) The administrative law judge shall make a proposed finding of the amount of reasonable costs of investigation and prosecution of the case when requested pursuant to subdivision (a). The finding of the administrative law judge with regard to costs shall not be reviewable by the department to increase the cost award. The department may reduce or eliminate the cost award, or remand to the administrative law judge if the proposed decision fails to make a finding on costs requested pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) If an order for recovery of costs is made and timely payment is not made as directed in the department’s decision, the department may enforce the order for repayment in any appropriate court. This right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the department may have as to any licensee to pay costs.

(e) In any action for recovery of costs, proof of the department’s decision shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms for payment.

(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the department shall not renew or reinstate the license of any licensee who has failed to pay all of the costs ordered under this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department may, in its discretion, conditionally renew or reinstate for a maximum of one year the license of any licensee who demonstrates financial hardship and who enters into a formal agreement with the department to reimburse the department within that one-year period for the unpaid costs.

(g) All costs recovered under this section shall be
 considered a reimbursement for costs incurred and shall be deposited into the Cannabis Control Fund to be available upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(h) Nothing in this section shall preclude the department from including the recovery of the costs of investigation and enforcement of a case in any stipulated settlement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 23.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26031.2.

(a) The superior court for the county in which any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act which constitutes a violation of this division may, upon a petition filed by the department with the approval of the director, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining such conduct. The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) The superior court for the county in which any person has engaged in any act which constitutes a violation of this division may, upon a petition filed by the department with the approval of the director, order such person to make restitution to persons injured as a result of such
 violation.

(c) The court may order a person subject to an injunction or restraining order, provided for in subdivision (a), or subject to an order requiring restitution pursuant to subdivision (b), to reimburse the department for expenses incurred by the department in its investigation related to its petition.

(d) The remedy provided for by this section shall be in addition to, and not a limitation on, the authority provided for in any other section of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 24.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26031.5.

(a) The department may issue a citation to a licensee or unlicensed person for any act or omission that violates or has violated any provision of this division or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto. The department shall issue the citation in writing, and shall describe with particularity the basis of the citation and the notification described in subdivision (c). The department may include in each citation an order of abatement and fix a reasonable time for abatement of the violation. The department may, as part of each citation, assess an administrative fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation by a licensee and thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per violation by an unlicensed person. Each day of violation shall constitute a separate violation. In assessing a fine, the department shall give due consideration to the appropriateness of the amount of the fine with respect to factors the department determines to be relevant, including the following:

(1) The gravity of the violation by the licensee or person.

(2) The good faith of the licensee or person.

(3) The history of previous violations.

(b) The sanctions authorized under this section shall be separate from, and in addition to, all other administrative, civil, or criminal remedies.

(c) A citation issued pursuant to this section shall include a provision that notifies the licensee or person that a hearing may be requested to contest the finding of a violation by submitting a written request within 30 days from service of the citation. The hearing shall be held pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), unless held in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) as authorized by regulation of the department. If the licensee or person cited fails to submit a written request for a hearing within 30 days from the date of service of the citation, the right to a hearing is waived and the citation shall be deemed a final order of the department and is not subject to review by any court.

(d) After the exhaustion of the administrative and judicial review procedures, the department may apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment in the amount of the administrative fine and an order compelling the cited person to comply with the order of the department. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the final order of the department, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment and order.

(e) The department may recover from the licensee or person who was the subject of the citation costs of investigation and enforcement, which may include reasonable attorney’s fees for the services rendered. If the department recovers costs from a licensee, the department shall recover the costs pursuant to Section 26031.1.

(f) Fines shall be paid within 30 days of service of a citation by the department. Failure to pay a fine assessed pursuant to this section within 30 days of the date of service of the citation, unless the citation is being appealed, shall constitute a separate violation under this division subject to additional action by the department. The department shall not renew or grant a license to a person who was the subject of the fine until that person pays the fine.

(g) All moneys collected pursuant to this section associated with the recovery of investigation and enforcement costs shall be deposited into the Cannabis Control Fund. Any administrative fine amount shall be deposited directly into the Cannabis Fines and Penalties Account and shall be distributed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 26210.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 25.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26031.6.

(a) It is a violation of this division for a person to use or possess the universal symbol described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 26130 in connection with commercial activity other than commercial cannabis activity licensed under this division. For purposes of this section, use or possession of the universal symbol in connection with commercial activity includes, but is not limited to, use or possession of any package, label, or advertisement of any kind bearing the universal symbol, or bearing any likeness, simulation, or any representation substantially similar to the universal symbol, whether or not that package, label, or advertisement is affixed to, or otherwise associated with, cannabis or cannabis products.

(b) A person using or possessing the universal symbol in connection with commercial activity shall do both of the following:

(1) Maintain records establishing that the use or possession is in connection with commercial cannabis activity licensed pursuant to this division.

(2) Produce those records upon demand of a peace officer, an employee of the department, or an employee of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(c) A person shall not alter or crop the universal symbol except in a manner allowed by this Division or permitted by regulation.

(d) Each individual package, label,
 advertisement, or other document or object of any kind bearing the universal symbol or any likeness or simulation of the universal symbol in violation of this section shall constitute a separate violation of this section.

(e) (1) A package, label, advertisement, or other document or object of any kind bearing the universal symbol or any likeness or simulation of the universal symbol in violation of this section is contraband and shall be seized and summarily forfeited to the state, and may be summarily destroyed by the state, subject to subdivision (f). A peace officer or an employee of the department may summarily seize such contraband.

(2) Failure to maintain or produce records as required pursuant
 to subdivision (b) in connection with a package, label, advertisement, or other document or object of any kind bearing the universal symbol shall establish that the package, label, advertisement, or other document or object is contraband for purposes of this subdivision.

(f) A person from whom a package, label, advertisement, or other document or object is seized pursuant to subdivision (e) may petition the superior court of the county in which the seizure occurred within 10 days of the seizure to seek the return of the package, label, advertisement, or other document or object. The petitioner shall bear the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the package, label, advertisement, or other document or object was not used or possessed in connection with commercial activity other than commercial cannabis
 activity licensed pursuant to this division.

(g) This section does not prohibit the educational, informational, or other noncommercial use or possession of the universal symbol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 6.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26032.

(a) The actions of a licensee, its employees, and its agents are not unlawful under state law and shall not be an offense subject to arrest, prosecution, or other sanction under state law, or be subject to a civil fine or be a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under state law if they are all of the following:

(1) Permitted pursuant to a state license.

(2) Permitted pursuant to a local authorization, license, or permit issued by the local jurisdiction, if any.

(3) Conducted in accordance with the requirements of this division and regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(b) The actions of a person who, in good faith, allows his or her property to be used by a licensee, its employees, and its agents, as permitted pursuant to a state license and, if required by the applicable local ordinances, a local license or permit, are not unlawful under state law and shall not be an offense subject to arrest, prosecution, or other sanction under state law, or be subject to a civil fine or be a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under state law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 18.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26033.

(a) A qualified patient, as defined in Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code, who cultivates, possesses, stores, manufactures, or transports cannabis exclusively for his or her personal medical use but who does not provide, donate, sell, or distribute cannabis to any other person is not thereby engaged in commercial cannabis activity and is therefore exempt from the licensure requirements of this division.

(b) A primary caregiver who cultivates, possesses, stores, manufactures, transports, donates, or provides cannabis exclusively for the personal medical purposes of no more than five specified qualified patients for whom he or she is the primary caregiver within the meaning of Section 11362.7 of the Health and Safety Code, but who does
 not receive remuneration for these activities except for compensation in full compliance with subdivision (c) of Section 11362.765 of the Health and Safety Code, is exempt from the licensure requirements of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 27, Sec. 20.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26034.

All accusations against licensees shall be filed by the department within five years after the performance of the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action; provided, however, that the foregoing provision shall not constitute a defense to an accusation alleging fraud or misrepresentation as a ground for disciplinary action. The cause for disciplinary action in that case shall not be deemed to have accrued until discovery, by the department, of the facts constituting the fraud or misrepresentation, and, in that case, the accusation shall be filed within five years after that discovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 26.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26035.

The director shall designate the persons employed by the department for purposes of the administration and enforcement of this division. The director shall ensure that a sufficient number of employees are qualified peace officers for purposes of enforcing this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 27.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26036.

Nothing in this division shall be interpreted to supersede or limit the department or other state and local agencies from exercising their existing enforcement authority, including, but not limited to, under this division, the Fish and Game Code, the Food and Agricultural Code, the Government Code, the Health and Safety Code, the Penal Code, the Public Resources Code, the Water Code, or the application of those laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 7.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

26037.

(a) The actions of a licensee, its employees, and its agents that are (1) permitted under a license issued under this division and any applicable local ordinances and (2) conducted in accordance with the requirements of this division and regulations adopted pursuant to this division, are not unlawful under state law and shall not be an offense subject to arrest, prosecution, or other sanction under state law, or be subject to a civil fine or be a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under state law.

(b) The actions of a person who, in good faith, allows his or her property to be used by a licensee, its employees, and its agents, as permitted pursuant to a state license and any applicable local ordinances, are not unlawful under state law
 and shall not be an offense subject to arrest, prosecution, or other sanction under state law, or be subject to a civil fine or be a basis for seizure or forfeiture of assets under state law.

(History: Added November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 64, Sec. 6.1.)
-------------------------------------------

26037.5.

(a) A person or entity shall not engage in commercial cannabis activity without a state license issued by the department pursuant to this division.

(b) The requirement to obtain a state license for the cultivation of cannabis pursuant to this division does not apply to the cultivation of cannabis in accordance with Section 11362.1 of the Health and Safety Code or the Compassionate Use Act or to persons or entities licensed under subdivision (b) of Section 26070.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 28.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26038.

(a) (1) A person engaging in commercial cannabis activity without a license as required by this division shall be subject to civil penalties of up to three times the amount of the license fee for each violation. Each day of operation shall constitute a separate violation of this section.

(2) (A) A person aiding and abetting unlicensed commercial cannabis activity shall be subject to civil penalties of up to three times the amount of the license fee for each violation, but in no case shall the penalty exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for each violation. Each day of operation of unlicensed commercial cannabis activity that a person is found to
 have aided and abetted shall constitute a separate violation of this section.

(B) For the purposes of this section, in order to prove that a person aided and abetted an unlicensed cannabis activity, all of the following shall be demonstrated:

(i) The person was an owner, officer, controlling shareholder, or in a similar position of authority allowing them to make command or control decisions regarding the operations and management of the unlicensed cannabis activity or the property in which the activity is taking place.

(ii) The person had actual knowledge that the cannabis activity was unlicensed and that the cannabis activity required a license.

(iii) The
 person provided substantial assistance or encouragement to the unlicensed cannabis activity.

(iv) The person’s conduct was a substantial factor in furthering the unlicensed cannabis activity.

(3) (A) A person who has management or control of a commercial property, or a commercial building, room, space, or enclosure, either as an owner, lessee, agent, employee, or mortgagee, who knowingly rents, leases, or makes available for use, with or without compensation, the commercial property, building, room, space, or enclosure for the purpose of the unlicensed commercial cultivation, manufacture, storage, sale, or distribution of cannabis shall be subject to civil penalties of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation. Each day of violation
 shall constitute a separate violation of this section.
